Utah statutes.
76-9-404.   Criminal defamation.

(1) A person is guilty of criminal defamation if he knowingly communicates to any person orally or in writing any information which he knows to be false and knows will tend to expose any other living person to public hatred, contempt, or ridicule.

(2)  Criminal defamation is a class B misdemeanor.

